Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.070

Discrimination prohibited.

Boards of trustees of college districts or any administrative officer thereof shall not discriminate against academic employees or applicants for such positions because of their membership or nonmembership in employee organizations or their exercise of other rights under this chapter.

[ 1991 c 238 s 151; 1971 ex.s. c 196 s 6.]